Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.010

Laws governing.

Cities of the first class shall be organized and governed according to the law providing for the government of cities having a population of ten thousand or more inhabitants that have adopted a charter in accordance with Article XI, section 10 of the state Constitution.

[ 1997 c 361 s 12; 1965 c 7 s 35.22.010. Prior: 1890 p 143 s 23; RRS s 8947.]

NOTES:

First-class city, defined: RCW 35.01.010.